Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-323 Revocation of authority.
(a) The commissioner shall revoke the authority of a domestic mutual insurer
to extinguish the contingent liability of its members if:

(1) At any time the insurer's assets are less than
the sum of its liabilities and the surplus required for such authority, or

(2) The insurer, by resolution of its directors
approved by its members, requests that the authority be revoked.

(b) Upon revocation of such authority for any
cause, the insurer shall not thereafter issue any policies without contingent
liability, nor renew any policies then in force without written endorsement
thereon providing for contingent liability. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next